src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! !!!Hill Mari (Western Mari) verb inflection

LEXICON VAux !!≈ * __@CODE@__ = auxiliaries first

+V+Aux: # ;

LEXICON V_АМ-HOM1 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ homonyms @hid=Hom1
+Hom1: V_АМ ;

LEXICON V_ЕМ-HOM2 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ homonyms @hid=Hom2
+Hom2: V_ЕМ ;

LEXICON V_АМ_SUB !!≈ * __@CODE@__ substandard
+Err/Orth: V_АМ ;

LEXICON V_ЕМ_SUB !!≈ * __@CODE@__ substandard
+Err/Orth: V_ЕМ ;

!! !!Regular verbs

!! !V_АМ verbs


LEXICON V_ИӒМ
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 619 2014-12-21
!! Front Vowel harmony for V_АМ verbs
 V_АМ ;
+V: INF_FRONT ;
+V: ACT-PRC_FRONT ;
+V: PSS-PRC_FRONT ;
+V: NEG-PRC_FRONT ;
LEXICON V_ИӒМ-SG3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 4 2014-12-21
!! Front Vowel harmony for V_АМ-SG3 verbs
 V_АМ-SG3 ;
LEXICON V_ИӒМ-3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 2 2014-12-21
!! Front Vowel harmony for V_АМ-3 verbs
 V_АМ-3 ;
+V: ACT-PRC_FRONT ;
+V: PSS-PRC_FRONT ;
+V: NEG-PRC_FRONT ;

LEXICON V_МОАМ
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 465 2014-12-21
!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_АМ	verbs
 V_АМ ; 
+V: INF_BACK ;
+V: ACT-PRC_BACK ;
+V: PSS-PRC_BACK ;
+V: NEG-PRC_BACK ;
LEXICON V_МОАМ-SG3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 2 2014-12-21
!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_АМ-SG3 verbs
 V_АМ-SG3 ; 
+V: ACT-PRC_BACK ;
+V: PSS-PRC_BACK ;
+V: NEG-PRC_BACK ;
LEXICON V_МОАМ-3
!! Approximately 1 2014-12-21
!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_АМ-3 verbs
 V_АМ-3 ; 

!! !STEM CHANGE
LEXICON V_ПӸЧКӒМ
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 12 2014-12-21
!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_АМ verbs
 V_АМ ;
+V: INF_FRONT ;
+V: ACT-PRC_FRONT ;
+V: PSS-PRC_FRONT ;
+V: NEG-PRC_FRONT ;
LEXICON V_ПӸЧКӒМ-SG3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 0 2014-12-21
!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_АМ-SG3 verbs
 V_АМ-SG3 ;
+V: ACT-PRC_FRONT ;
+V: PSS-PRC_FRONT ;
+V: NEG-PRC_FRONT ;
LEXICON V_ПӸЧКӒМ-3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 0 2014-12-21
!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_АМ-3 verbs
 V_АМ-3 ;

LEXICON V_КАЧКАМ
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 11 2014-12-21
!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_АМ verbs
 V_АМ ;
+V: INF_BACK ;
+V: ACT-PRC_BACK ;
+V: PSS-PRC_BACK ;
+V: NEG-PRC_BACK ;
LEXICON V_КАЧКАМ-SG3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 0 2014-12-21
!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_АМ-SG3 verbs
 V_АМ-SG3 ;
+V: ACT-PRC_BACK ;
+V: PSS-PRC_BACK ;
+V: NEG-PRC_BACK ;
LEXICON V_КАЧКАМ-3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 0 2014-12-21
!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_АМ-3 verbs
 V_АМ-3 ;


LEXICON	V_ВИДЕМ
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 1052 2014-12-21
!! Front Vowel harmony for V_ЕМ	verbs
 V_ЕМ ;
+V: INF_FRONT ;
+V: ACT-PRC_FRONT ;
+V: PSS-PRC_FRONT ;
+V: NEG-PRC_FRONT ;
LEXICON	V_ВИДЕМ-SG3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 2 2014-12-21
!! Front Vowel harmony for V_ЕМ-SG3 verbs
 V_ЕМ-SG3 ;
+V: ACT-PRC_FRONT ;
+V: PSS-PRC_FRONT ;
+V: NEG-PRC_FRONT ;

LEXICON	V_АЗЕМ
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 1315 2014-12-21
!! Back	Vowel harmony for  V_ЕМ verbs
 V_ЕМ ;
+V: INF_BACK ;
+V: ACT-PRC_BACK ;
+V: PSS-PRC_BACK ;
+V: NEG-PRC_BACK ;
LEXICON	V_АЗЕМ-SG3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 4 2014-12-21
!! Back	Vowel harmony for  V_ЕМ verbs
 V_ЕМ-SG3 ;
+V: ACT-PRC_BACK ;
+V: PSS-PRC_BACK ;
+V: NEG-PRC_BACK ;
LEXICON	V_АЗЕМ-3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 1 2014-12-21
!! Back	Vowel harmony for  V_ЕМ verbs
 V_ЕМ-3 ;



LEXICON V_АМ !!= @CODE@ ӹштӓш:ӹшт
+V: INDPRSSG1-am ;
+V: INDPRSSG2-am ;
+V: INDPRSSG3-am ;
+V: INDPRSPL1-am ;
+V: INDPRSPL2-am ;
+V: INDPRSPL3-am ;
+V: INDPRSCONNEG-am ;
+V: INDPRSPL3CONNEG-am ;

+V: INDPRT1SG1-am ;
+V: INDPRT1SG2-am ;
+V: INDPRT1SG3-am ;
+V: INDPRT1PL1-am ;
+V: INDPRT1PL2-am ;
+V: INDPRT1PL3-am ;
+V: INDPRT1CONNEG-am ;
+V: INDPRT1PL3CONNEG-am ;

+V: INDPRT2SG1-am ;
+V: INDPRT2SG2-am ;
+V: INDPRT2SG3-am ;
+V: INDPRT2PL1-am ;
+V: INDPRT2PL2-am ;
+V: INDPRT2PL3-am ;
+V: INDPRT2NEG-am ;


+V: IMPRTSG2-am   ;
+V: IMPRTSG3-am ;
+V: IMPRTPL2-am   ;
+V: IMPRTPL3-am ;

+V: IMPRTIISG2-am ;
+V: IMPRTIIPL2-am ;

+V: DES-am ;

!+V: INF ;
!+V+ActPrc:%>ш%{ыӹØ%} K ; !! Contlex needed
!+V+ActPrc+Der/шЫ:%>ш%{ыӹØ%} NMN_ТӸРВӸ ;
!+V: PSS-PRC ;
!+V: NEG-PRC ;

LEXICON V_АМ-3
 V_АМ-SG3 ;
+V: INDPRSPL3-am ;
+V: INDPRSPL3CONNEG-am ;
+V: INDPRT1PL3-am ;
+V: INDPRT1PL3CONNEG-am ;
+V: INDPRT2PL3-am ;
+V: INDPRT2NEG-am ;
+V: IMPRTPL3-am ;

LEXICON V_АМ-SG3 !! пелӓш: онг пелеш
+V: INDPRSSG3-am ;
+V: INDPRSCONNEG-am ;
+V: INDPRT1SG3-am ;
+V: INDPRT1CONNEG-am ;
+V: INDPRT2SG3-am ;
+V: IMPRTSG3-am ;
+V: DESSG3-am ;
!! What else is needed 2014-05-08
!+V: INF ;
!+V+ActPrc:%>ш%{ыӹØ%} K ; !! Contlex needed
!+V+ActPrc+Der/шЫ:%>ш%{ыӹØ%} NMN_ТӸРВӸ ;
!+V: PSS-PRC ;
!+V: NEG-PRC ;


!LEXICON V_ЕМ  = * @CODE@ колташ:колты
!+V: INDPRSSG1-em ;
!+V: INDPRSSG2-em ;
!+V: INDPRSSG3-em ;
!+V: INDPRSPL1-em ;
!+V: INDPRSPL2-em ;
!+V: INDPRSPL3-em ;
!+V: INDPRSCONNEG-em ;
!+V: INDPRSPL3CONNEG-em ;
!
!+V: INDPRT1SG1-em ;
!+V: INDPRT1SG2-em ;
!+V: INDPRT1SG3-em ;
!+V: INDPRT1PL1-em ;
!+V: INDPRT1PL2-em ;
!+V: INDPRT1PL3-em ;
!+V: INDPRT1CONNEG-em ;
!+V: INDPRT1PL3CONNEG-em ;
!
!
!+V: INDPRT2SG1-em ;
!+V: INDPRT2SG2-em ;
!+V: INDPRT2SG3-em ;
!+V: INDPRT2PL1-em ;
!+V: INDPRT2PL2-em ;
!+V: INDPRT2PL3-em ;
!+V: INDPRT2NEG-em ;
!
!+V: IMPRTSG2-em   ;
!+V: IMPRTSG3-em ;
!+V: IMPRTPL2-em   ;
!+V: IMPRTPL3-em ;
!
!+V: IMPRTIISG2-em ;
!+V: IMPRTIIPL2-em ;
!
!+V: DES-em ;
!
!+V: INF ;
!+V+ActPrc:%>%{ыӹØ%}ш%{ыӹØ%} K  ;  Contlex needed
!+V+ActPrc+Der/шЫ:%>%{ыӹØ%}шЫ2 NMN_ТӸРВӸ ;
!+V+PssPrc+Der/мЫ:%>%{ыӹØ%}мЫ2 NMN_ТӸРВӸ ;
!+V+NegPrc+Der/дЫмЫ:%>%{ыӹØ%}дЫ2мЫ2 NMN_ТӸРВӸ ;

LEXICON V_ЕМ-3
 V_ЕМ-SG3 ;
+V: INDPRSPL3-em ;
+V: INDPRSPL3CONNEG-am ;
+V: INDPRT1PL3-am ;
+V: INDPRT1PL3CONNEG-am ;
+V: INDPRT2PL3-am ;
+V: INDPRT2NEG-am ;
+V: IMPRTPL3-am ;

LEXICON V_ЕМ-SG3 !! хӹдӹртӓш: хӹдӹртӹ
+V: INDPRSSG3-em ;
+V: INDPRSCONNEG-am ;
+V: INDPRT1SG3-em ;
+V: INDPRT1CONNEG-am ;
+V: INDPRT2SG3-am ;
+V: IMPRTSG3-am ;
+V: DESSG3-am ;
!! What else is needed 2014-05-08
!+V: INF ;
!+V+ActPrc:%>ш%{ыӹØ%} K ; !! Contlex needed
!+V+ActPrc+Der/шЫ:%>ш%{ыӹØ%} NMN_ТӸРВӸ ;
!+V: PSS-PRC ;
!+V: NEG-PRC ;


!!-1
LEXICON V_ЕМ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ колташ:колты
+V: INDPRSSG1-am ;
+V: INDPRSSG2-am ;
+V: INDPRSSG3-em ;
+V: INDPRSPL1-am ;
+V: INDPRSPL2-am ;
+V: INDPRSPL3-em ;
+V: INDPRSCONNEG-am ;
+V: INDPRSPL3CONNEG-am ;

+V: INDPRT1SG1-em ;
+V: INDPRT1SG2-em ;
+V: INDPRT1SG3-em ;
+V: INDPRT1PL1-em ;
+V: INDPRT1PL2-em ;
+V: INDPRT1PL3-am ;
+V: INDPRT1CONNEG-am ;
+V: INDPRT1PL3CONNEG-am ;


+V: INDPRT2SG1-am ;
+V: INDPRT2SG2-am ;
+V: INDPRT2SG3-am ;
+V: INDPRT2PL1-am ;
+V: INDPRT2PL2-am ;
+V: INDPRT2PL3-am ;
+V: INDPRT2NEG-am ;

+V: IMPRTSG2-am   ;
+V: IMPRTSG3-am ;
+V: IMPRTPL2-am   ;
+V: IMPRTPL3-am ;

+V: IMPRTIISG2-am ;
+V: IMPRTIIPL2-am ;

+V: DES-am ;

!+V: INF ;
!+V+Der/шЫ+ActPrc:%>ш%{ыӹØ%} K  ; !! Contlex needed
!+V+Der/шЫ+ActPrc:%>ш%{ыӹØ%} NMN_ТӸРВӸ ;
!+V: PSS-PRC ;
!+V: NEG-PRC ;


!! !NONPAST 

!! !am verbs

LEXICON INDPRSSG1-am
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>%{аӓе%}м K ;

LEXICON INDPRSSG2-am
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>%{аӓе%}т K ;

LEXICON INDPRSSG3-am
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>еш K ; 

LEXICON INDPRSPL1-am
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>%{ыӹе%}н%{аӓ%} K ;

LEXICON INDPRSPL2-am
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>%{ыӹе%}д%{аӓ%} K ;

LEXICON INDPRSPL3-am
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>%{ыӹØ%}т K ;

LEXICON INDPRSCONNEG-am
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%^ConsTransf K ;

LEXICON INDPRSPL3CONNEG-am
+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg:%^ConsTransf%>Е2п K ;

!! !em verbs

LEXICON INDPRSSG1-em
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>ем K ;

LEXICON INDPRSSG2-em
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>ет K ;

LEXICON INDPRSSG3-em
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>%{аӓ%} K ;

LEXICON INDPRSPL1-em
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>енӓ K ;

LEXICON INDPRSPL2-em
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>едӓ K ;

LEXICON INDPRSPL3-em
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>%{аӓ%}т K ;

LEXICON INDPRSCONNEG-em
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>%{ыӹØ%} K ;

LEXICON INDPRSPL3CONNEG-em
+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg:%>Е2п K ;



!! !!PRETERIT 1 

!! !am

LEXICON INDPRT1SG1-am
+Ind+Prt1+Sg1:Ь2%>%{ыӹØ%}м K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1SG2-am
+Ind+Prt1+Sg2:Ь2%>%{ыӹØ%}ц K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1SG3-am
+Ind+Prt1+Sg3:Ь2%>%{ыӹØ%} K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1PL1-am
+Ind+Prt1+Pl1:%^ConsTransfЬ2%>н%{аӓ%} K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1PL2-am
+Ind+Prt1+Pl2:%^ConsTransfЬ2%>д%{аӓ%} K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1PL3-am
+Ind+Prt1+Pl3:%>евӹ K ; !
